Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Financial Support

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools §§ 99 to 117.

79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts §§ 503 to 507.

§ 21-13-301.
Distribution to school districts of money in common school account for use of public schools.

Between January 1 and June 30 of each year, if there is any money to the credit of the common school account within the permanent land income fund for the use of the public schools in the state treasury, the state treasurer shall, after making any distributions necessary under W.S. 21-15-108(a), distribute the income in the account to the school foundation program. The state treasurer may make distributions to the school foundation program under this section at such times and in such amounts as may be advantageous for the state’s investment program and cash management, but all income shall be credited to the school foundation program not later than June 30 of each year.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 53, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 93; C.S. 1910, § 135; 1920, § 144; Laws 1921, ch. 147, § 1; 1927, ch. 89, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 109-703; C.S. 1945, § 18-603; Laws 1955, ch. 161, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-86; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 224; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-224; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1979, ch. 75, § 1; 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 1995, ch. 171, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 305; 2000, ch. 12, § 1.

Constitutional provisions as to school fund must be harmonized

and construed together to give effect to intent to keep intact the permanent school fund. State v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 163, 212 P. 758,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(1923); State ex rel. School Dist. No. 2 v. Hoskins, 29 Wyo. 198, 212 P. 766,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1923).

Right to education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth. —

Although the quality of a child's education in the state, measured in terms of dollars available for that purpose, is dependent upon the property tax resources of his school district, the right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Absolute equality in funding school districts per pupil not required. —

Each school district need not receive exactly the same number of dollars per pupil as every other school district, because exact or absolute equality is not required. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Determination of school attendance, enrollment, or pupil population for purpose of apportionment of funds, 80 ALR2d 953.

Validity of public school funding systems, 110 ALR5th 293.

Procedural issues concerning public school funding cases, 115 ALR5th 563.

§ 21-13-302.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 260, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 53, § 1, related to distribution of money to school districts by the county treasurer. For present similar provisions, see §

21-13-301

.

§ 21-13-303.
Levy of state tax; disposition of funds; reduction of mill levy.

For the support of the public elementary and secondary schools of the state, there shall be assessed and levied each year a state tax of twelve (12) mills on the dollar of the assessed valuation of the property within the state as certified on August 10 under W.S.

39-11-102

.1(c)(v) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section. The tax is in addition to any and all other taxes authorized by law.

The funds that may accrue under this section shall be placed in a separate account. Balances in the account, if any, shall not lapse or be transferred to any other fund or account.

Between July 1 and July 10 of each year the state auditor and the state treasurer shall determine if the unobligated average daily general fund balance over the preceding fiscal year exceeds twenty percent (20%) of the amount of the general fund appropriations for the present biennium. If the unobligated average daily general fund balance exceeds twenty percent (20%) of the amount appropriated, the excess is appropriated and shall be transferred into the foundation program account as soon as possible. The auditor and treasurer shall immediately notify the state board of equalization of the amount to be transferred. Based on the current assessed valuation of the state, the board shall compute the estimated amount of revenue to be produced by a twelve (12) mill levy, subtract the amount transferred to the foundation program account and then compute the mill levy necessary to produce the difference. The board shall certify the recomputed mill levy to the county assessors to be levied and collected in lieu of the twelve (12) mill state levy for the next tax year.

History.

Laws 1949, ch. 121, §§ 1, 2; 1955, ch. 119, § 10; W.S. 1957, §§ 39-75, 39-76; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 226; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-226; Laws 1973, ch. 127, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1977, ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b), substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Right to education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth. —

Although the quality of a child's education in the state, measured in terms of dollars available for that purpose, is dependent upon the property tax resources of his school district, the right to an education cannot constitutionally be conditioned on wealth in that such a measure does not afford equal protection. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Equal Protection and the Financing of Public Education in Wyoming,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 273 (1973).

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-304.
State treasurer to keep separate account.

The state treasurer shall keep a separate account and except as otherwise provided by law all monies appropriated for school purposes shall be kept in such account.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 72, div. 3, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 611; C.S. 1910, § 1962; C.S. 1920, § 2266; R.S. 1931, § 99-340; C.S. 1945, § 67-212; Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 21-47; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 227; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-227; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” following “a separate account.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 21-13-305.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

21-13-101

by Laws 1983, ch. 136, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definitions applicable to this article, see §

21-13-101

.

§ 21-13-306.
Foundation program account established; disposition of monies.

The public school foundation program account is established to consist of funds appropriated to, or designated to the account by law, or by gift from whatever source, for distribution to districts in accordance with this article.

Within the limits of legislative appropriation, if any, the resources of the public school foundation account shall be paid into the state treasury and shall be drawn out and distributed to the districts upon certification of the state superintendent and upon vouchers approved by the state auditor payable to the treasurer of the several districts.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 2.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 21-64; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 229; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-229; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 98, § 2; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “program account.”

The 2009 amendment,

added (c).

Laws 2009, ch. 98, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” in (b).

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b), substituted “state superintendent” for “director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, deleted (c).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 98, § 3 provides: “Funds shall be deposited in accordance with W.S. 21-13-306(c) as created by this act commencing with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2009.”

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 178, § 2, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates 100,000 from the school foundation program account to the department of education to fund the Wyoming teacher policy institute in collaboration with the University of Wyoming during school year 2005-2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Intent of program. —

The public school foundation program's intent is to guarantee a minimum education for every child by providing state financial assistance in inverse proportion to the tax-paying ability of the local school district. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Absolute equality in funding school district per pupil not required. —

Each school district need not receive exactly the same number of dollars per pupil as every other school district because exact or absolute equality is not required. Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 449 U.S. 824, 101 S. Ct. 86, 66 L. Ed. 2d 28, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 2692 (U.S. 1980).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-306.1.
School foundation program reserve account; purposes.

The school foundation program reserve account created by 2014 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 26, Section 300(g) is continued and codified. Funds within the account shall only be expended by legislative appropriation. All funds within the account shall be invested by the state treasurer and all investment earnings from the account shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

2015 ch. 195, § 1, effective March 10, 2015.

§ 21-13-307.
Eligibility to share in distribution of money from foundation account; mandatory financial reporting.

Each district which meets the following requirements is eligible to share in the distribution of funds from the foundation account:

Employed and compensated teachers for not less than nine (9) school months during the previous year and has actually employed and is compensating at least one (1) teacher for the current year, except that a newly organized district need not have employed any teachers during the previous year in order to qualify for its first year of operation;

Operated all schools for a term of at least one hundred eighty-five (185) days or the number of days or equivalent hours authorized under an alternative schedule approved by the state board during the previous school year. If the school term of any school in a district was less than one hundred eighty-five (185) days or less than the total number of days authorized under an alternative schedule approved by the state board, the amount allotted per average daily membership (ADM) under W.S.

21-13-309

for the school shall be in proportion to the length of the term the school actually operated, unless caused by closures of schools:

Due to fuel shortages, fire, construction problems, weather, civil disturbance or threatened civil disturbance, days of national recognition, widespread illnesses; or

Whenever necessary to protect the health, safety or welfare of students, teachers and other employees and closures are approved by the state superintendent or are the result of presidential or gubernatorial executive orders.

Furnishes to the state superintendent statistical data and information as reasonably required to compute a district’s entitlement to share in the foundation account and the extent of the entitlement;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 205, § 2.

Each district shall provide financial reports to the department on forms and in such manner required by the department under W.S.

21-2-203

and by rules and regulations promulgated by the state superintendent of public instruction pursuant to this article. In administering this article, the state superintendent may conduct audits of information submitted by districts under this article as necessary to administer and perform computations pertaining to the cost components within the education resource block grant model, and may, after consulting and negotiating with the school district, correct the information reported by districts under this article to fairly and accurately reflect the data type, classification and format necessary to perform computations required to administer the school finance system established under this article.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 21-65; Laws 1959, ch. 67, § 2; 1967, ch. 109, § 4; 1969, ch. 111, § 230; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-230; Laws 1974, ch. 15, § 1; ch. 16, § 2; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1985, ch. 122, § 1; 1993, ch. 168, § 5; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 2000, ch. 87, § 1; 2006, ch. 37, § 1; 2011, ch. 185, § 1; 2012, ch. 101, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2017 ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to state board of education, see §

21-2-301

.

As to minimum school year, see §

21-4-301

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, twice substituted “one hundred eighty-five days (185)” for “one hundred eighty days (180)” in (a)(ii); in (b) substituted “department” for “division of data management and reporting,” and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(iv).

The 2012 amendment,

in (a)(iv), added “or schools designated as exceeding expectations pursuant to W.S. 21-2-204(e)(i)(A)” to the third sentence and inserted the present fourth sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 101 § 8, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent of public instruction” or similar language throughout the section.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in (a)(ii)(B), (a)(iii), (a)(iv), and (b).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iv), substituted “21-2-204(f)(i)(A)” for “21-2-204(e)(i)(A)” twice near the middle of the paragraph.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 205, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(iv).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Summer school grant program. —

Laws 2007, ch. 147, § 2, amends Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 3, and states in relevant part:

“[SUMMER SCHOOL/EXTENDED DAY/ENRICHMENT PROGRAMS]

“(a)

The summer school grant program is established for the 2006 and 2007 summer sessions to provide financial assistance to districts for the provision of intervention, remediation and enrichment instruction to students beyond the required school year specified by law under W.S.

21-4-301

and 21-13-307(a)(ii).
The grant program shall augment amounts within the education resource block grant model for addressing at-risk student needs over a transitional period during which full cost-based funding will be implemented and total at-risk program resources are being reviewed.
Assistance made available under the grant program shall supplement district intervention, remediation and enrichment programs and shall at minimum, be made available to students requiring additional instruction to master statewide content and performance standards prescribed by the state board of education under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii) or otherwise seeking credit recovery for promotion to the subsequent grade level.
Summer school programs eligible for assistance under this section shall also:

“(ii)

Provide a minimum of sixty (60) instructional hours to each elementary school student and a minimum of sixty (60) instructional hours to each middle and high school student.
High school students may demonstrate proficiency prior to receiving the full sixty (60) hours of instruction;

“(b)

In addition to subsection (a) of this section, programs providing enrichment instruction to students and before-school, after-school and Saturday school enhanced instruction for student mastery of the state content and performance standards are eligible for assistance under this section. Before-school, after-school and Saturday school programs for student mastery of state standards shall augment amounts within the education resource block grant model for addressing at-risk student needs over a transitional period during which full cost-based funding will be implemented and total at-risk program resources are being reviewed. To receive funding eligibility under this subsection, a district shall file program plans with the department of education requesting use of a portion of summer school program funds otherwise available under this section, not to exceed a maximum level established by rule and regulation of the department.
Plans submitted to the department shall be filed within the time specifications imposed upon the applicant district for summer school grants and shall be subject to program requirements and criteria established by the department.

“(c)

To receive grant assistance under this section, a district shall apply to the department of education on or before April 15, 2006, and by April 15, 2007 for the 2007 summer school session and the 2007-2008 school year, as applicable.
Application review by the department shall be completed by May 1 of the appropriate year.
On or before May 1, 2006, and May 1, 2007, as applicable, districts shall be notified by the department of any estimated grant amount to be made available to the district during the appropriate summer school session and school year.
Application to the department shall be in a manner and form prescribed by the department and shall include:

“(f)

As soon as reasonably possible following the effective date of this section as amended by the 2007 Wyoming legislature, the department of education shall notify school districts of the availability of assistance under the summer school grant program established under this section and of the requirements imposed upon districts to obtain a grant award.”

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Applied

in

Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-13-308.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 304.